Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise. Terms and phrases used in this chapter that are not defined in this section must be defined as consistent with implementation of a state health benefit exchange pursuant to applicable federal law.

(1) "Authority" means the Washington state health care authority, established under chapter 41.05 RCW.

(2) "Board" means the governing board established in RCW 43.71.020.

(3) "Commissioner" means the insurance commissioner, established in Title 48 RCW.

(4) "Exchange" means the Washington health benefit exchange established in RCW 43.71.020.

(5) "Self-sustaining" means capable of operating with revenue attributable to the operations of the exchange. Self-sustaining sources include, but are not limited to, federal grants, federal premium tax subsidies and credits, charges to health carriers, premiums paid by enrollees, and premium taxes under RCW 48.14.0201(5)(b) and 48.14.020(2).

[ 2018 c 44 s 1; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 6 s 1; 2012 c 87 s 2; 2011 c 317 s 2.]